Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 1

Establishment of Office

16-18-101. Governing body may provide for office of municipal judge.

In any municipality in this state having a mayor's court or a municipal court presided over by the mayor of the municipality or the city recorder of the municipality and having no other provision for a municipal judge for the municipality, the governing body of the municipality is authorized by ordinance to provide for the office of municipal judge.

Acts 1973, ch. 330, § 1; 1975, ch. 231, § 1; T.C.A., § 17-123; modified; T.C.A., § 17-1-501.

Compiler's Notes. This section was formerly compiled as § 17-1-501.

Cross-References. City courts, title 6, ch. 4, part 3.

Power of general assembly to create court, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 26.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Municipal Courts (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431.

Attorney General Opinions. Repeal of adoption of home rule, 98-0106 (6/11/98).

Comparative Legislation. Municipal court judges:

Ala. Code § 12-14-30 et seq.

Ark. Code § 16-17-207 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 36-32-1 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 21-23-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 478.230.

Va. Code § 16.1-69.6:1 et seq.

Cited: City of White House v. Whitley, 979 S.W.2d 262, 1998 Tenn. LEXIS 573 (Tenn. 1998).

16-18-102. Contents of ordinance.

The ordinance providing for the office of municipal judge shall provide:

That the municipal judge is vested with the judicial powers and functions of the mayor or city recorder of such municipality, and is subject to the provisions of law and the municipality's charter governing the mayor's court or the municipal court presided over by the mayor or city recorder;

For qualifications of the municipal judge;

That the municipal judge shall be appointed by the governing body of the municipality, to serve at the pleasure of the governing body;

That vacancies in the office shall be filled for the unexpired term by the governing body;

For oath of office and bonding of the municipal judge before entering upon the duties of this office;

That the cost of making the bond of the municipal judge shall be paid by the municipality;

That the salary of the municipal judge shall be fixed by the governing body before the municipal judge's appointment, and shall not be altered during the municipal judge's term of service; and

For the designation of a person to serve as judge during the absence or disability of the municipal judge.

Acts 1973, ch. 330, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 231, § 1; T.C.A., § 17-123; modified; T.C.A., § 17-1-502.

Compiler's Notes. This section was formerly compiled as § 17-1-502.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 26.

Cited: State by South Carthage v. Barrett, 840 S.W.2d 895, 1992 Tenn. LEXIS 570 (Tenn. 1992); City of White House v. Whitley, 979 S.W.2d 262, 1998 Tenn. LEXIS 573 (Tenn. 1998).